src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Кенде+Sem/Plc:Кендь PROP-SETTLEMENT_ПАНГО  "Tšindjanovo" ;
Морго+Sem/Plc:Морг PROP-SETTLEMENT_ПАНГО  "Morga" ;
Саран% ош+Sem/Plc:Саран% ош PROP-SETTLEMENT_ОШ  "Saransk" ;
Азия:Азия PROP-SETTLEMENT_КУДО  "" ;
Аллах:Аллах PROP_КАЛ_DIVINITY  "XX" ;
Ало% пелькс:Ало% пелькс PROP-SETTLEMENT_ОШ  "" ;
Алоош:Ало#ош PROP-SETTLEMENT_ОШ  "Nižni Novgorod" ;
Ангень% Теште:Ангень% Теште PROP_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
Аргум:Аргум PROP_КАЛ_DIVINITY  "" ;
Африка:Африка PROP-SETTLEMENT_КУДО  "" ;
Ашоош:Ашоош PROP-SETTLEMENT_ОШ  "Belgrad" ;
Будапешт:Будапешт PROP-SETTLEMENT_КИТ  "Budapest" ;
Вармаава:Варма#ава PROP_КУДО_DIVINITY  "" ;
Варсон+Sem/Mal:Варсон PROP_КАЛ  "" ;
Вирьава:Вирь#ава PROP_КУДО_DIVINITY  "metsänemo" ;
Вить+Sem/Mal:Вить PROP_КИТ  "" ;
Витя+Sem/Mal:Витя PROP_КУДО  "" ;
Волга:Волга PROP_КУДО_RIVERS  "" ;
Волгомас+Sem/Mal:Волгомас PROP_ОШ  "" ;
Дигань% ки:Дигань% ки PROP_КУДО_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Дормидонт+Sem/Mal:Дормидонт PROP_КИТ  "" ;
Дуболго+Sem/Fem:Дуболго PROP_ПАНГО  "" ;
Евангелия:Евангелия PROP_КУДО_TXT  "evankeliumi" ;
Егорей+Sem/Mal:Егорей PROP_КАЛ  "" ;
Епа+Sem/Mal:Епа PROP_КУДО  "" ;
Епиш+Sem/Mal:Епиш PROP_ОШ  "" ;
Илимбург:Илимбург PROP-SETTLEMENT_КАЛ  "" ;
Инекече:Инекече PROP_КУДО_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Инечи:Инечи PROP_КУДО_HOLIDAY  "" ;
Инешкай:Инешкай PROP_КАЛ_DIVINITY  "" ;
Инешки:Инешке PROP_КУДО_DIVINITY  "" ;
Инешкипаз:Инешкипаз PROP_ОШ_DIVINITY  "" ;
Ицял:Ицял PROP-SETTLEMENT_КАЛ  "Itšalki" ;
Капит+Sem/Mal:Капит PROP_КИТ  "" ;
Каргонь% Ки:Каргонь% Ки PROP_КУДО_CONSTELLATION  "linnunrata" ;
Кардазсярко:Кардазсярко PROP_ПАНГО_DIVINITY  "pihanhaltija" ;
Кастарго+Sem/Fem:Кастарго PROP_ПАНГО  "" ;
Керемедьпаз:Керемедьпаз PROP_ОШ_DIVINITY  "" ;
Кечепуло:Кечепуло PROP_КУДО_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Коль+Sem/Mal:Коль PROP_КАЛ  "" ;
Конуш+Sem/Mal:Конуш PROP_ОШ  "" ;
Косакрандаз:Косакрандаз PROP_ОШ_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Кузьмич:Кузьмич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL  "" ;
Куломаатя:Кулома#атя PROP_КУДО_DIVINITY  "XX" ;
Курсякс:Курсякс PROP_ОШ_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Покш% кече:Покш% кеч PROP_ПАНГО_CONSTELLATION  "Otava" ;
Ларя+Sem/Mal:Ларя PROP_КУДО  "" ;
Мартеште:Мар#теште PROP_ТЕШТЕ_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Мацеень% ки:Мацеень% ки PROP_КУДО_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Митипер+Sem/Mal:Митипер PROP_КАЛ  "" ;
Митит+Sem/Mal:Митит PROP_КИТ  "" ;
Модаава:Мода#ава PROP_КУДО_DIVINITY  "" ;
Модапаз:Модапаз PROP_ОШ_DIVINITY  "" ;
Модя+Sem/Mal:Модя PROP_КУДО  "" ;
Мордовия:Мордовия PROP-SETTLEMENT_КУДО  "Mordva" ;
Муром:Муром PROP-SETTLEMENT_КАЛ  "" ;
Наруш+Sem/Mal:Наруш PROP_ОШ  "" ;
Нишкепаз:Нишке#паз PROP_ОШ_DIVINITY  "ylijumala" ;
Озязкеть:Озязке PROP_КУДО-PL_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Озял:Озял PROP_КАЛ_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Оренбург:Оренбург PROP-SETTLEMENT_КАЛ  "Orenburg" ;
Повадьвеле:Повадьвеле PROP-SETTLEMENT_КУДО  "" ;
Паз:Паз PROP_ОШ_DIVINITY  "" ;
Паргеле:Паргеле PROP-SETTLEMENT_КУДО  "" ;
Педуль+Sem/Mal:Педуль PROP_КАЛ  "" ;
Пелевень% курцякс:Пелевень% курцякс PROP_ОШ_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Пелевень% курцякст:Пелевень% курцякст PROP_ОШ-PL_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Петрович:Петрович PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL  "" ;
Пилат+Sem/Mal:Пилат PROP_КИТ  "" ;
Прокопыч:Прокопыч PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL  "" ;
Пургаз+Sem/Mal:Пургаз PROP_ОШ  "" ;
Рав:Рав PROP_КАЛ_RIVERS  "Volga" ;
Раськень% Озкс:Раськень% Озкс PROP_ОШ_HOLIDAY  "" ;
Ратор:Ратор PROP_КАЛ_RIVERS  "" ;
Ратор% лей:Ратор% лей PROP_КАЛ_RIVERS  "" ;
Ратор% ош:Ратор% ош PROP-SETTLEMENT_ОШ  "" ;
Северьянович:Северьянович PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL  "" ;
Семан+Sem/Mal:Семан PROP_КАЛ  "" ;
Семёнович:Семёнович PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL  "" ;
Сенипонт+Sem/Mal:Сенипонт PROP_КИТ  "" ;
Сисем% Озязт:Сисем% Озяз PROP_ОШ-PL_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Спас:Спас PROP_ОШ_HOLIDAY  "" ;
Стёпа+Sem/Mal:Стёпа PROP_КУДО  "" ;
Сярдо+Sem/Mal:Сярд PROP_ПАНГО  "" ;
Татарстан:Татарстан PROP-SETTLEMENT_КАЛ  "XX" ;
Украина:Украина PROP-SETTLEMENT_КУДО  "Ukraina" ;
Чачома% Мастор:Чачома% Мастор PROP-SETTLEMENT_КАЛ  "" ;
Чипаз:Чи#паз PROP_ОШ_DIVINITY  "" ;
Юрталя:Юрт#аля PROP_КУДО_DIVINITY  "" ;
Як+Sem/Mal:Як PROP_ЛАК  "" ;
Якомас+Sem/Mal:Якомас PROP_ОШ  "" ;
Яксяргонь% Пизэ:Яксяргонь% Пизэ PROP_КУДО_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Ярук+Sem/Mal:Ярук PROP_ЛАК  "" ;
Эрьзямас:Эрьзямас PROP-SETTLEMENT_ОШ  "" ;
